test/src/morphology/V-tyorye_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - тёресь: # Verb 'to shout' - partial paradigm
     тёресь+V+Refl+Ind+Aor+RcSg1: [тёреювˮ, тёрейв]
     тёресь+V+Refl+Ind+Aor+RcSg2: [тёреян, тёрейн]
     тёресь+V+Refl+Ind+Aor+RcSg3: тёрейˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Ind+Aor+RcDu1: тёрейниʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Ind+Aor+RcDu2: тёрейдиʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Ind+Aor+RcDu3: тёрейхаʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Ind+Aor+RcPl1: тёрейнаˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Ind+Aor+RcPl2: тёрейдаˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Ind+Aor+RcPl3: [тёреядˮ, тёрейдˮ]
     тёресь+V+Refl+Ind+Prt1+RcSg1: тёрейваць
     тёресь+V+Refl+Ind+Prt1+RcSg2: тёрейнась
     тёресь+V+Refl+Ind+Prt1+RcSg3: тёреяць
     тёресь+V+Refl+Ind+Prt1+RcDu1: тёрейнинзь
     тёресь+V+Refl+Ind+Prt1+RcDu2: тёрейдинзь
     тёресь+V+Refl+Ind+Prt1+RcDu3: тёрейханзь
     тёресь+V+Refl+Ind+Prt1+RcPl1: тёрейнаць
     тёресь+V+Refl+Ind+Prt1+RcPl2: тёрейдаць
     тёресь+V+Refl+Ind+Prt1+RcPl3: тёрейдаць
     тёресь+V+Refl+Hort+RcSg1: тёрехавˮ  #ваˮ if 3rd or 5th syllable
     тёресь+V+Refl+Hort+RcDu1: тёреханиʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Hort+RcPl1: тёреханаˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Imprt+RcSg2: тёредˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Imprt+RcDu2: тёрейдиʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Imprt+RcPl2: тёрейдаˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Opt+RcSg3: тёреямдˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Opt+RcDu3: тёреяхамдˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Opt+RcPl3: тёреядамдˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Conj+Aor+RcSg1: тёреивˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Conj+Aor+RcSg2: тёреин
     тёресь+V+Refl+Conj+Aor+RcSg3: тёреиˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Conj+Aor+RcDu1: тёреиниʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Conj+Aor+RcDu2: тёреидиʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Conj+Aor+RcDu3: тёреихаʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Conj+Aor+RcPl1: тёреинаˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Conj+Aor+RcPl2: тёреидаˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Conj+Aor+RcPl3: тёреидˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Conj+Prt1+RcSg1: тёреиваць
     тёресь+V+Refl+Conj+Prt1+RcSg2: тёреинась
     тёресь+V+Refl+Conj+Prt1+RcSg3: тёреиць
     тёресь+V+Refl+Conj+Prt1+RcDu1: тёреининзь
     тёресь+V+Refl+Conj+Prt1+RcDu2: тёреидинзь
     тёресь+V+Refl+Conj+Prt1+RcDu3: тёреиханзь
     тёресь+V+Refl+Conj+Prt1+RcPl1: тёреинаць
     тёресь+V+Refl+Conj+Prt1+RcPl2: тёреидаць
     тёресь+V+Refl+Conj+Prt1+RcPl3: тёреидаць
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/nec+RcSg1: тёребцувˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/nec+RcSg2: тёребцун
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/nec+RcSg3: тёребцуˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/nec+RcDu1: тёребцуниʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/nec+RcDu2: тёребцудиʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/nec+RcDu3: тёребцухуʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/nec+RcPl1: тёребцунаˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/nec+RcPl2: тёребцудаˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/nec+RcPl3: тёребцудˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/int+RcSg1: тёресявˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Dial/W+Mod/int+RcSg1: тёресивˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/int+RcSg2: тёресян
     тёресь+V+Refl+Dial/W+Mod/int+RcSg2: тёресин
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/int+RcSg3: тёресяˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Dial/W+Mod/int+RcSg3: тёресиˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/int+RcDu1: тёресяниʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Dial/W+Mod/int+RcDu1: тёресиниʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/int+RcDu2: тёресядиʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Dial/W+Mod/int+RcDu2: тёресидиʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/int+RcDu3: тёресяхаʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Dial/W+Mod/int+RcDu3: тёресихаʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/int+RcPl1: тёресянаˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Dial/W+Mod/int+RcPl1: тёресинаˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/int+RcPl2: тёресядаˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Dial/W+Mod/int+RcPl2: тёресидаˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/int+RcPl3: тёресядˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Dial/W+Mod/int+RcPl3: тёресидˮ   
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Aor+RcSg1: тёревэвˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Aor+RcSg2: тёревэн
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Aor+RcSg3: тёревыˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Aor+RcDu1: тёревэниʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Aor+RcDu2: тёревэдиʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Aor+RcDu3: тёревэхэʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Aor+RcPl1: тёревэнаˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Aor+RcPl2: тёревэдаˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Aor+RcPl3: тёревыдˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Prt1+RcSg1: тёревэваць
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Prt1+RcSg2: тёревэнась
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Prt1+RcSg3: тёревыць
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Prt1+RcDu1: тёревэнинзь
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Prt1+RcDu2: тёревэдинзь
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Prt1+RcDu3: тёревэханзь
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Prt1+RcPl1: тёревэнаць
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Prt1+RcPl2: тёревэдаць
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/narr+Prt1+RcPl3: тёревыдаць
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Aor+RcSg1: тёренакэвˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Aor+RcSg2: тёренакэн
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Aor+RcSg3: тёренакыˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Aor+RcDu1: тёренакэниʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Aor+RcDu2: тёренакэдиʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Aor+RcDu3: тёренакэхэʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Aor+RcPl1: тёренакэнаˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Aor+RcPl2: тёренакэдаˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Aor+RcPl3: тёренакыдˮ 
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Prt1+RcSg1: тёренакэваць
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Prt1+RcSg2: тёренакэнась
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Prt1+RcSg3: тёренакыць
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Prt1+RcDu1: тёренакэнинзь
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Prt1+RcDu2: тёренакэдинзь
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Prt1+RcDu3: тёренакэхэнзь
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Prt1+RcPl1: тёренакэнаць
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Prt1+RcPl2: тёренакэдаць
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/prob+Prt1+RcPl3: тёренакыдаць
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/perfprob+RcSg1: тёревэкэвˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/perfprob+RcSg2: тёревэкэн
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/perfprob+RcSg3: тёревэкыˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/perfprob+RcDu1: тёревэкэниʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/perfprob+RcDu2: тёревэкэдиʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/perfprob+RcDu3: тёревэкэхэʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/perfprob+RcPl1: тёревэкэнаˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/perfprob+RcPl2: тёревэкэдаˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/perfprob+RcPl3: тёревэкыдˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/obl+RcSg1: тёребцакэвˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/obl+RcSg2: тёребцакэн
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/obl+RcSg3: тёребцакыˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/obl+RcDu1: тёребцакэниʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/obl+RcDu2: тёребцакэдиʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/obl+RcDu3: тёребцакэхэʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/obl+RcPl1: тёребцакэнаˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/obl+RcPl2: тёребцакэдаˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/obl+RcPl3: тёребцакыдˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/appr+RcSg1: тёренархывˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/appr+RcSg2: тёренархын
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/appr+RcSg3: тёренархыˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/appr+RcDu1: тёренархыниʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/appr+RcDu2: тёренархыдиʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/appr+RcDu3: тёренархыхаʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/appr+RcPl1: тёренархынаˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/appr+RcPl2: тёренархыдаˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/appr+RcPl3: тёренархыдˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/perfappr+RcSg1: тёревэрхывˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/perfappr+RcSg2: тёревэрхын
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/perfappr+RcSg3: тёревэрхыˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/perfappr+RcDu1: тёревэрхыниʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/perfappr+RcDu2: тёревэрхыдиʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/perfappr+RcDu3: тёревэрхыхаʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/perfappr+RcPl1: тёревэрхынаˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/perfappr+RcPl2: тёревэрхыдаˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/perfappr+RcPl3: тёревэрхыдˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/futappr+RcSg1: тёревандархывˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/futappr+RcSg2: тёревандархын
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/futappr+RcSg3: тёревандархыˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/futappr+RcDu1: тёревандархыниʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/futappr+RcDu2: тёревандархыдиʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/futappr+RcDu3: тёревандархыхаʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/futappr+RcPl1: тёревандархынаˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/futappr+RcPl2: тёревандархыдаˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/futappr+RcPl3: тёревандархыдˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/sup+RcSg1: тёреванӈгабивˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/sup+RcSg2: тёреванӈгабин
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/sup+RcSg3: тёреванӈгабиˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/sup+RcDu1: тёреванӈгабиниʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/sup+RcDu2: тёреванӈгабидиʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/sup+RcDu3: тёреванӈгабихаʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/sup+RcPl1: тёреванӈгабинаˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/sup+RcPl2: тёреванӈгабидаˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/sup+RcPl3: тёреванӈгабидˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/hyp+RcSg1: тёрерахавэвˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/hyp+RcSg2: тёрерахавэн
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/hyp+RcSg3: тёрерахавыˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/hyp+RcDu1: тёрерахавэниʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/hyp+RcDu2: тёрерахавэдиʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/hyp+RcDu3: тёрерахавэхэʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/hyp+RcPl1: тёрерахавэнаˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/hyp+RcPl2: тёрерахавэдаˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/hyp+RcPl3: тёрерахавыдˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/rep+RcSg1: тёревнавˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/rep+RcSg2: тёревнан
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/rep+RcSg3: тёревнаˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/rep+RcDu1: тёревнаниʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/rep+RcDu2: тёревнадиʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/rep+RcDu3: тёревнахаʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/rep+RcPl1: тёревнанаˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/rep+RcPl2: тёревнадаˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/rep+RcPl3: тёревнадˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/des+RcSg1: тёрерабивˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/des+RcSg2: тёрерабин
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/des+RcSg3: тёрерабиˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/des+RcDu1: тёрерабиниʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/des+RcDu2: тёрерабидиʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/des+RcDu3: тёрерабихаʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/des+RcPl1: тёрерабинаˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/des+RcPl2: тёрерабидаˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Mod/des+RcPl3: тёрерабидˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+InfImprf: тёрева  
     тёресь+V+Refl+InfPrf: тёреˮма  
     тёресь+V+Refl+PrcImprf: тёрена
     тёресь+V+Refl+PrcPrf: тёревы
     тёресь+V+Refl+PrcFut: тёреванда   
     тёресь+V+Refl+PrcNeg: тёревдавэй
     тёресь+V+Refl+Ger: [тёре, тёресь] 
     тёресь+V+Refl+GerFin: тёреванзь      
     тёресь+V+Refl+Subord: тёребˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Aud: [тёревоʼ, тёреваноʼ]
     тёресь+V+Refl+Evas: тёревоӈгад
     тёресь+V+Refl+ConNeg: тёреˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Fut+ConNeg: тёреӈгуˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Subord+PxSg1: [тёребˮнани, тёребаˮни]
     тёресь+V+Refl+Subord+PxSg2: [тёребˮнанд, тёребат]
     тёресь+V+Refl+Subord+PxSg3: [тёребˮнанда, тёребата, тёребатавʼ] 
     тёресь+V+Refl+Subord+PxDu1: [тёребˮнаниʼ, тёребаˮниʼ]
     тёресь+V+Refl+Subord+PxDu2: [тёребˮнандиʼ, тёребаˮтиʼ]
     тёресь+V+Refl+Subord+PxDu3: [тёребˮнандиʼ, тёребаˮтиʼ]
     тёресь+V+Refl+Subord+PxPl1: [тёребˮнанаˮ, тёребаˮнаˮ]
     тёресь+V+Refl+Subord+PxPl2: [тёребˮнандаˮ, тёребатаˮ]
     тёресь+V+Refl+Subord+PxPl3: [тёребˮнандоʼ, тёребатоʼ]
     тёресь+V+Refl+Fut+Ind+Aor+RcSg1: тёреӈгувˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Fut+Ind+Aor+RcSg2: тёреӈгун
     тёресь+V+Refl+Fut+Ind+Aor+RcSg3: тёреӈгуˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Fut+Ind+Aor+RcDu1: тёреӈгуниʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Fut+Ind+Aor+RcDu2: тёреӈгудиʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Fut+Ind+Aor+RcDu3: тёреӈгухуʼ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Fut+Ind+Aor+RcPl1: тёреӈгунаˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Fut+Ind+Aor+RcPl2: тёреӈгудаˮ
     тёресь+V+Refl+Fut+Ind+Aor+RcPl3: тёреӈгудˮ
